Utah statutes.
19-6-1102.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Board" means the Solid and Hazardous Waste Control Board created under Section 19-1-106.

(2)  "Director" means the director of the Division of Solid and Hazardous Waste.

(3)  "Division" means the Division of Solid and Hazardous Waste, created in Subsection 19-1-105(1)(e).

(4) (a)  "Industrial byproduct" means an industrial residual, including:

(i)  inert construction debris;

(ii)  fly ash;

(iii)  bottom ash;

(iv)  slag;

(v)  flue gas emission control residuals generated primarily from the combustion of coal or other fossil fuel;

(vi)  residual from the extraction, beneficiation, and processing of an ore or mineral;

(vii)  cement kiln dust; or

(viii)  contaminated soil extracted as a result of a corrective action subject to an operation plan under Part 1, Solid and Hazardous Waste Act.

(b)  "Industrial byproduct" does not include material that:

(i)  causes a public nuisance or public health hazard; or

(ii)  is a hazardous waste under Part 1, Solid and Hazardous Waste Act.

(5)  "Public project" means a project of the Department of Transportation to construct:

(a)  a highway or road;

(b)  a curb;

(c)  a gutter;

(d)  a walkway;

(e)  a parking facility;

(f)  a public transportation facility; or

(g)  a facility, infrastructure, or transportation improvement that benefits the public.

(6)  "Reuse" means to use an industrial byproduct in place of a raw material.



Amended by Chapter 360, 2012 General Session

